test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-ooqgi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - ǭʼgi: # adjectives 200 'eng /est hall/fin' - full paradigm
     ǭʼgi+A+Sg+Nom: [ǭʼgi, ǭgi, ōʼgi, ōgi]
     ǭʼgi+A+Sg+Gen: [ǭʼgiz, ǭgiz, ōʼgiz, ōgiz]
     ǭʼgi+A+Sg+Par: [ǭʼgizt, ǭgizt, ōʼgizt, ōgizt]
     ǭʼgi+A+Sg+Dat: [ǭʼgizõn, ǭgizõn, ōʼgizõn, ōgizõn]
     ǭʼgi+A+Sg+Ins: [ǭʼgizõks, ǭgizõks, ōʼgizõks, ōgizõks]
     ǭʼgi+A+Sg+Ill: [ǭʼgizõ, ǭgizõ, ōʼgizõ, ōgizõ]
     ǭʼgi+A+Sg+Ela: [ǭʼgizõst, ǭgizõst, ōʼgizõst, ōgizõst]
     ǭʼgi+A+Pl+Nom: [ǭʼgizt, ǭgizt, ōʼgizt, ōgizt]
     ǭʼgi+A+Pl+Gen: [ǭʼgizt, ǭgizt, ōʼgizt, ōgizt]
     ǭʼgi+A+Pl+Par: [ǭʼgiži, ǭgiži, ōʼgiži, ōgiži]
     ǭʼgi+A+Pl+Dat: [ǭʼgiztõn, ǭgiztõn, ōʼgiztõn, ōgiztõn]
     ǭʼgi+A+Pl+Ins: [ǭʼgiztõks, ǭgiztõks, ōʼgiztõks, ōgiztõks]
     ǭʼgi+A+Pl+Ill: [ǭʼgižiz, ǭgižiz, ōʼgižiz, ōgižiz]
     ǭʼgi+A+Pl+Ela: [ǭʼgižist, ǭgižist, ōʼgižist, ōgižist]
